sl-SI: Raven konkavnosti deske: Globok; Srednji; Blag; Drugo
ru: Уровень конкейва деки: Глубокий; Средний; Небольшой; Другое
pt-BR: Nível côncavo do shape: Profundo; Médio; Suave; Outro
nb: Dekks konkavnivå: Dyp; Middels; Slak; Annet
sk-SK: Úroveň konkávnosti paluby: Hlboké; Stredné; Mierne; Iné
en: Deck concave level: Deep; Medium; Mellow; Other
de: Konkavitätsgrad des Decks: Tief; Mittel; Flach; Sonstige
cs: Úroveň prohnutí desky (concave): Hluboký; Střední; Mírný; Jiné
fr: Niveau de concavité du plateau: Profond; Moyen; Doux; Autre
sv: Däckets konkava nivå: Djup; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
lt-LT: Deck įgaubimo lygis: Gilus; Vidutinis; Švelnus; Kita
bg-BG: Ниво на извивка на дъската: Дълбоко; Средно; Плитко; Друго
ko: 데크 오목면 레벨: 깊음; 중간; 완만함; 기타
vi: Độ lõm của ván trượt: Sâu; Trung bình; Thoải; Khác
nl: Deck concave niveau: Diep; Medium; Mellow; Overige
ja: デッキの凹面レベル: ディープ; ミディアム; メロー; その他
hu: A gördeszkalap konkáv szintje: Mély; Közepes; Enyhe; Egyéb
el: Επίπεδο κοίλανσης της πλατφόρμας: Βαθύ; Μεσαίο; Ελαφρύ; Άλλο
fi: Skeittilaudan dekin kaarevuus: Syvä; Keskitaso; Loiva; Muu
zh-TW: 板面凹度等級: 深; 中; 淺; 其他
pt-PT: Nível côncavo do convés: Profundo; Médio; Suave; Outro
es: Nivel cóncavo de la tabla: Profundo; Medio; Suave; Otro
zh-CN: 板面凹度等级: 深; 中; 浅; 其他
th: ระดับความโค้งเว้าของแผ่นสเกตบอร์ด: ลึก; ปานกลาง; ตื้น; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Nivel concavitate a punții: Adânc; Mediu; Redus; Altele
it: Livello concavo del ponte: Profondo; Medio; Leggero; Altro
da: Dækets konkavitet: Dyb; Medium; Let; Andet
tr: Kaykay tahtası konkav seviyesi: Derin; Orta; Hafif; Diğer
hr-HR: Ravan podbubnja palube: Duboko; Srednje; Blago; Ostalo
pl: Poziom wklęsłości decku: Głęboki; Średni; Płytki; Inne